Connecticut, session 2026, HB05151.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 15, 2027, the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, shall submit
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the environment a report that details
any proposal or recommendation of the commissioner that is derived
from the results of the most recent waste characterization study
undertaken by the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, any
recommendation for the establishment of extended producer
responsibility programs for components of the state's waste stream,
including, but not limited to, consumer packaging or products and
construction and demolition debris and any proposed additional
designations of recyclable items to be source separated. Such report
shall include a draft of any statutory revisions required to implement
any such proposal or recommendation.
LCO No. 843 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5151
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section